District of Columbia statutes.
24-907

Rules.

The Mayor may issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

History

Dec. 7, 1985, D.C. Law 6-69, § 8, 32 DCR 4587
June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-302, § 9(f), 47 DCR 7249

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-807.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-302, in the section heading, deleted “; division of responsibility”; and deleted “, including the division of responsibility between the District of Columbia Board of Parole and the District of Columbia Department of Corrections” following “Title 2,”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 9(f) of the Sentencing Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-410, August 11, 2000, 47 DCR 7271).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 9(f) of the Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 13-462, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9443).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 9(f) of Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-2, February 2, 2001, 48 DCR 2239).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 9(f) of Sentencing Reform Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-51, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4370).

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 6-69, see Mayor’s Order 87-61, March 10, 1987.